District of Columbia statutes.
18-108

Execution of power by will.

An appointment made by will in the exercise of a power is not valid unless it is so executed that it would be valid for the disposition of the property to which the power applies if it belonged to the testator.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 687, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-108.
1973 Ed., § 18-108.